Louisiana, session 2026, HB345.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 48:388.1(A)(2)(f) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§388.1. Class II and III Rail Infrastructure Improvement Program
A.
* * *
(2) The program shall be made available to Class II and III railroads for rail
improvement needs to maintain efficient rail service on the rail network and to
implement recommendations in the Louisiana Freight Mobility Plan and State Rail
Plan. Eligible projects include but are not limited to:
* * *
(f) Rail infrastructure at ports.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.